Hawaii, session 2025, GM1149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAH:
SECTION 1. Section 232-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) Any protesting taxpayer who would incur a total tax
liability, not including penalties and interest, of less than
$1,000, by reason of the protested assessment or payment in
question, may elect to employ the procedure established by this
section upon:
(1) Payment per taxpayer of a nonrefundable filing fee set
pursuant to rules adopted by the supreme court, which
shall not exceed $25; and
(2) Filing with the tax appeal court a written statement
of the facts in the case, together with a waiver of
the right to further appeal.
The tax appeal court shall cause a notice of the appeal and a
copy of the statement to be served on the director of taxation
[and] in the case of an appeal involving the department of
taxation, or on the real property assessment division of the
2025-2703 SB1467 HDl HMSO

Page 2 S.B. NO. 1467
H.D, 1
county involved in the case of an appeal [from a dcoioion]
involving [a] the county [as——feha-real property
anocaament divioian—o-f--the county involved.] , or upon both the
director of taxation and the real property assessment division
of the county involved in the case of an appeal involving both
the department of taxation and the county."
SECTION 2. Section 232-16, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a ) A taxpayer or county may appeal directly to the tax
appeal court without appealing to the state taxation board of
review or any equivalent administrative body established by
county ordinance; provided that a taxpayer appealing a real
property tax assessment shall first obtain a decision from an
administrative body established by county ordinance, before
appealing to the tax appeal court, if county ordinance requires
a taxpayer to do so. An appeal permitted by law to the tax
appeal court is properly commenced by filing, on or before the
date fixed by law for the taking of the appeal, a written notice
of appeal in the office of the tax appeal court and by service
of the notice of appeal on the director of taxation [and,]
the case of an appeal involving the department of taxation, or
2025-2703 SB1467 HDl HMSO
liiiiimnBMM

Page 3 S.B. NO. 1467
H.D. 1
on the real property assessment division of the county involved
in the case of an appeal [from a—dcei-s4-en] involving the county
[as a party/—the real -prope-rty-'asocaomont division of the county
involved--.-] , or upon both the director of taxation and the real
property assessment division of the county involved in the case
of an appeal involving both the department of taxation and the
county. An appealing taxpayer shall also pay the costs in the
amount fixed by section 232-22."
SECTION 3. Section 232-17, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§232-17 Appeals from taxation board of review to tax
appeal court. An appeal shall lie to the tax appeal court from
the decision of the state taxation board of review, or
equivalent administrative body established by county ordinance.
An appeal to the tax appeal court shall be properly commenced by
the filing, by the taxpayer, county, or director of taxation, of
a written notice of appeal in the office of the tax appeal court
within thirty days after the filing of the decision of the state
taxation board of review or an equivalent county administrative
body, and, in the case of any appealing taxpayer, the payment of
the costs of court in the amount fixed by section 232-22, and
2025-2703 SB1467 HDl HMSO
iiiiiniiiiiiiiiiiniiiiii

Page 4 S.B. NO. 1467
H.D. 1
service of the notice of appeal on the director of taxation
[and-, ] in the case of an appeal involving the department of
taxation, or on the real property assessment division of the
county involved in the case of an appeal [from a dccinion]
involving the county [a-s a party,—the real property assessment
divars-i-eft—ef—^the—eeuftty—iftveived-^] , or upon both the director of
taxation and the real property assessment division of the county
involved in the case of an appeal involving both the department
of taxation and the county. A notice of appeal shall be
sufficient if it states that the taxpayer, county, or director
of taxation appeals from the decision of the state taxation
board of review, or an equivalent county administrative body, to
the tax appeal court and may be amended at any time. The appeal
shall bring up for determination all questions of fact and all
questions of law, including constitutional questions involved in
the appeal.
In case of an appeal by the county or director of taxation,
a copy of the notice of appeal shall be forthwith delivered or
mailed to the taxpayer concerned or to the clerk of the county
concerned in the manner provided in section 232-7 for giving
notice of decisions.
2025-2703 SB1467 HDl HMSO

Page 5 S.B. NO. 1467
H.D. 1
An appeal shall be deemed to have been taken in time, and
properly commenced, if the notice thereof and costs, if any, and
the copy or copies of the notice [shall] have been deposited in
the mail, postage prepaid, properly addressed to the tax appeal
court, [director - of-- taxation, ] taxpayer or taxpayers, and [—]
director of taxation or, if relevant, the real property
assessment division of the county involved, respectively, within
the time period provided by this section."
SECTION 4. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2703 SB1467 HDl HMSO 5

1467
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
APPROVED this 14th day of May ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 1467, H.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 16, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
President
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 1467, HD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE
STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 2, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives